test/src/gt-norm-yamls/smj-tests-from-old-infra_gt-norm.yaml
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednaginámge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednaginámgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: bednaginám
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednaginátga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednaginátge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednaginátgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: bednaginát
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednaginesga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednaginesge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednaginesgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: bednagines
    bena+N+Sg+Ine: bednagin
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/ga: benaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/ge: benage
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gen: benagen
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Foc/ga: [benamaga, bednagimmega]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [benamage, benamak, bednagimmege, bednagimmek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Foc/gen: [benamagen, bednagimmegen]
    bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [benama, bednagimme]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Foc/ga: [benadaga, bednagihttega]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [benadage, benadak, bednagihttege, bednagihttek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Foc/gen: [benadagen, bednagihttegen]
    bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [benada, bednagihtte]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Foc/ga: [benaskaga, bednagiskaga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [benaskage, benaskak, bednagiskage, bednagiskak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Foc/gen: [benaskagen, bednagiskagen]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [benaska, bednagiska]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/ga: [benamaga, bednagimmega]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [benamage, benamak, bednagimmege, bednagimmek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/gen: [benamagen, bednagimmegen]
    bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: [benama, bednagimme]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/ga: [benadaga, bednagihttega]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [benadage, benadak, bednagihttege, bednagihttek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/gen: [benadagen, bednagihttegen]
    bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [benada, bednagihtte]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/ga: [benasaga, bednagisága]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [benasage, benasak, bednagiságe, bednagisák]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/gen: [benasagen, bednagiságen]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [benasa, bednagisá]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/ga: [benamga, bednagamga, bednagimga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/ge: [benamge, bednagamge, bednagimge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/gen: [benamgen, bednagamgen, bednagimgen]
    bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [benam, bednagam, bednagim]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/ga: [benatga, bednagatga, bednagitga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/ge: [benatge, bednagatge, bednagitge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/gen: [benatgen, bednagatgen, bednagitgen]
    bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: [benat, bednagat, bednagit]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/ga: [benasga, bednagisga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/ge: [benasge, bednagisge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/gen: [benasgen, bednagisgen]
    # bena+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [benas, bednagis]
    bena+N+Sg+Nom: bena
